Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.082

Office of minority and women's business enterprises—Certain personnel exempted from chapter.

In addition to the exemptions set forth in RCW 41.06.070, this chapter shall not apply in the office of minority and women's business enterprises to the director, the director's confidential secretary, and the deputy director.

[ 1983 c 120 s 14.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Applicability—Severability—Conflict with federal requirements—1983 c 120: See RCW 39.19.910, 39.19.920.